Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201544-3910
Prelicensing education requirements; exemptions.

The prelicensing education requirements of section 44-3909 shall not apply to an individual who, at the time of application for an insurance producer license:

(1) Is applying for qualification for the life insurance line of authority and has the certified employee benefit specialist designation, the chartered financial consultant designation, the certified insurance counselor designation, the certified financial planner designation, the chartered life underwriter designation, the fellow life management institute designation, or the Life Underwriter Training Council fellow designation;

(2) Is applying for qualification for the accident and health or sickness insurance line of authority and has the registered health underwriter designation, the certified employee benefit specialist designation, the registered employee benefit consultant designation, or the health insurance associate designation;

(3) Is applying for qualification for the property insurance, casualty insurance, or personal lines property and casualty insurance line of authority and has the accredited advisor in insurance designation, the associate in risk management designation, the certified insurance counselor designation, or the chartered property and casualty underwriter designation;

(4) Is applying for a limited lines travel insurance producer license pursuant to section 44-4068;

(5) Has a college degree with a concentration in insurance from an accredited educational institution;

(6) Is an individual described in section 44-4056 or 44-4058; or

(7) Is a person who the director may exempt pursuant to a rule or regulation adopted and promulgated pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 96;

R.S.1943, (1998), § 44-4005.02;

Laws 2001, LB 51, § 30;

Laws 2008, LB855, § 25;

Laws 2015, LB458, § 2.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.